tr: Değerli malzemeler için uygun: Elmas; Değerli taş; Gold; Sert değerli taş; Metal; Platin; Silver; Yumuşak değerli taş; Diğer
ja: 貴重な素材に適しています: ダイヤモンド; 宝石; ゴールド; 硬い宝石; 金属; プラチナ; シルバー; 柔らかい宝石; その他
en: Suitable for precious material: Diamond; Gemstone; Gold; Hard gemstone; Metal; Platinum; Silver; Soft gemstone; Other
hr-HR: Plemeniti materijali za koje je prikladno: Dijamant; Dragi kamen; Zlato; Tvrdi dragi kamen; Metal; Platina; Srebro; Meki dragi kamen; Ostalo
fi: Sopii arvokkaille materiaaleille: Timantti; Korukivi; Kulta; Kova korukivi; Metalli; Platina; Hopea; Pehmeä korukivi; Muu
el: Κατάλληλο για πολύτιμα υλικά: Διαμάντι; Πολύτιμος λίθος; Χρυσό; Σκληρός πολύτιμος λίθος; Μέταλλο; Πλατίνα; Ασήμι; Μαλακός πολύτιμος λίθος; Άλλο
bg-BG: Подходящ за благородни материали: Диамант; Скъпоценен камък; Злато; Твърд скъпоценен камък; Метал; Платина; Сребро; Мек скъпоценен камък; Други
th: เหมาะกับวัสดุล้ำค่า: เพชร; หินอัญมณี; โกลด์; หินอัญมณีแบบแข็ง; โลหะ; แพลทินัม; ซิลเวอร์; หินอัญมณีแบบอ่อน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru materiale prețioase: Diamant; Piatră prețioasă; Auriu; Piatră prețioasă dură; Metal; Platină; Argint; Piatră prețioasă moale; Altele
vi: Phù hợp với vật liệu quý: Kim cương; Đá quý; Vàng; Đá quý cứng; Kim loại; Bạch kim; Trắng; Đá quý mềm; Khác
pt-PT: Adequado para materiais preciosos: Diamante; Pedra preciosa; Ouro; Pedra preciosa dura; Metal; Platina; Prata; Pedra preciosa macia; Outro
pl: Odpowiednie do cennego materiału: Diament; Kamienie szlachetne; Złota; Twarde kamienie szlachetne; Metal; Platyna; Srebrna; Miękkie kamienie szlachetne; Inne
fr: Convient aux matériaux précieux: Diamant; Gemme; Or; Gemme dure; Métal; Platinum; Argent; Gemme tendre; Autre
pt-BR: Adequado para materiais preciosos: Diamante; Pedra preciosa; Gold; Pedra preciosa dura; Metal; Platinado; Silver; Pedra preciosa macia; Outro
sl-SI: Primerno za plemenit material: Diamant; Dragi kamen; Zlato; Trden dragi kamen; Kovina; Platina; Srebro; Mehki dragi kamen; Drugo
sv: Lämplig för exklusiva material: Diamant; Ädelsten; Gyllene; Hård ädelsten; Metall; Platina; Silver; Mjuk ädelsten; Övrigt
de: Geeignet für Edelmaterialien: Diamant; Edelstein; Gold; Harter Edelstein; Metall; Platin; Silber; Weicher Edelstein; Sonstiges
it: Adatto per materiali preziosi: Diamante; Pietra preziosa; Oro; Pietra preziosa dura; Metallo; Platino; Argento; Pietra preziosa morbida; Altro
nl: Materiaal geschikt voor kostbaar: Diamant; Edelsteen; Gold; Harde edelsteen; Metaal; Platina; Silver; Zachte edelsteen; Andere
cs: Vhodné pro drahý materiál: Diamant; Drahokam; Zlatá; Tvrdý rahokam; Kov; Platina; Stříbrná; Měkký drahokam; Jiné
lt-LT: Tinka brangioms medžiagoms: Deimantas; Brangakmenis; Auksinė; Kietasis brangakmenis; Metalas; Platina; Sidabrinė; Minkštasis brangakmenis; Kita
da: Velegnet til ædle materialer: Diamant; Ædelsten; Guld; Hård ædelsten; Metal; Platin; Sølv; Blød ædelsten; Andet
es: Adecuado para materiales preciosos: Diamante; Piedra preciosa; Dorado; Piedra preciosa dura; Metal; Platino; Plateado; Piedra preciosa blanda; Otros
zh-TW: 適用於貴重材料: 鑽石; 寶石; 金色; 硬質寶石; 金屬; 白金; 銀色; 軟質寶石; 其他
ru: Для каких драгоценных материалов: Алмаз; Драгоценный камень; Золото; Твердый драгоценный камень; Металл; Платина; Серебро; Мягкий драгоценный камень; Другое
sk-SK: Vhodné na vzácny materiál: Diamant; Drahokam; Zlato; Tvrdý drahokam; Kov; Platinum; Strieborný; Mäkký drahokam; Iné
ko: 귀중한 자료에 적합: 다이아몬드; 보석; 금색; 단단한 원석; 금속; 백금; 은색; 부드러운 원석; 기타
hu: Nemesfémhez használható: Gyémánt; Drágakő; Arany; Kemény drágakő; Fém; Platina; Ezüst; Puha drágakő; Egyéb
zh-CN: 适用的贵重材料: 钻石; 宝石; 金色; 硬质宝石; 金属; 白金色; 银色; 软质宝石; 其他
nb: Egnet for dyrebart materiale: Diamant; Edelsten; Gull; Hard edelsten; Metall; Platina; Sølv; Myk edelsten; Annet